Georgia, session 2025_26, SB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 6 of Chapter 1 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Behavioral Health Reform and Innovation Commission, is amended by revising subsection
(a) of Code Section 37-1-112, relating to the members, terms, officers, and operational
matters of the commission, as follows:
"(a) The commission shall be composed of 24 30 members as follows:
(1) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) A chairperson;
(B) A psychiatrist who specializes in children and adolescents;
(C) A psychiatrist who specializes in adults;
S. B. 233
- 1 -

LC 33 9804S (SCS)
(D) A health care provider with expertise in traumatic brain injuries;
(E) A state education official with broad experience in education policy;
(F) A chief executive officer of a mental health facility;
(G) A forensic psychologist;
(H) A local education official; and
(I) A professional who specializes in substance abuse and addiction;
(J) An individual with lived experience having survived the disease of addiction who
is a certified addiction recovery specialist; and
(K) An intellectual and developmental disabilities provider;
(2) The following members appointed by the President of the Senate:
(A) Two members of the Senate;
(B) A sheriff;
(C) A licensed clinical behavioral health professional;
(D) A behavioral health advocate; and
(E) A representative of a community service board;
(F) An individual who has lost a member of his or her immediate family to drug
overdose or fentanyl poisoning; and
(G) A leader of an intellectual and developmental disabilities advocacy organization;
(3) The following members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives:
(A) Two members of the House of Representatives;
(B) A police chief;
(C) A licensed clinical behavioral health professional;
(D) A behavioral health advocate; and
(E) A judge who presides in an accountability court, as defined in Code Section
15-1-18; and
(F) A professional who is an executive director of an accredited Georgia nonprofit
organization focused on addiction and recovery; and
S. B. 233
- 2 -

LC 33 9804S (SCS)
(G) The parent of an individual with intellectual and developmental disabilities or an
individual with intellectual and developmental disabilities; and
(4) The following members appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of
Georgia:
(A) One Justice of the Supreme Court of Georgia; and
(B) Two judges."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 37-1-115, relating to
subcommittees, as follows:
"37-1-115.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the The chairperson of the
commission shall appoint members of the following subcommittees from among the
membership of the commission and may also appoint up to two other
noncommission-member persons as he or she may determine to be necessary as relevant
to and consistent with this article:
(1) Children and Adolescent Behavioral Health;
(2) Involuntary Commitment Addictive Diseases;
(3) Hospital and Short-Term Care Facilities;
(4) Mental Health Courts and Corrections; and
(5) Workforce and System Development Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities.
(b) The chairperson, at his or her discretion, may designate and appoint other
subcommittees from among the membership of the commission and may also appoint up
to two other noncommission-member persons as he or she may determine to be necessary
as relevant to and consistent with this article."
S. B. 233
- 3 -

LC 33 9804S (SCS)
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 37-1-116, relating to abolishment
and termination, as follows:
"37-1-116.
The commission shall be abolished and this article shall stand repealed on June 30, 2025
December 31, 2026."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 233
- 4 -